Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.17.010

Application to existing corporations.

(1) Unless otherwise provided, this title applies to all domestic corporations in existence on July 1, 1990, that were incorporated under any general statute of this state providing for incorporation of corporations for profit.

(2) Unless otherwise provided, a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on July 1, 1990, is subject to this title but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under this title.

[ 1989 c 165 s 188.]